Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 12 Returns
21-2-495.
Procedure for recount or recanvass of votes; losing candidate’s right to a recount; rules and regulations.

In precincts where paper ballots or scanning ballots have been used, the superintendent may, either of his or her own motion or upon petition of any candidate or political party, order the recount of all the ballots for a particular precinct or precincts for one or more offices in which it shall appear that a discrepancy or error, although not apparent on the face of the returns, has been made. Such recount may be held at any time prior to the certification of the consolidated returns by the superintendent and shall be conducted under the direction of the superintendent. Before making such recount, the superintendent shall give notice in writing to each candidate and to the county or municipal chairperson of each party or body affected by the recount. Each such candidate may be present in person or by representative, and each such party or body may send two representatives to be present at such recount. If upon such recount, it shall appear that the original count by the poll officers was incorrect, such returns and all papers being prepared by the superintendent shall be corrected accordingly.

In precincts where voting machines have been used, whenever it appears that there is a discrepancy in the returns recorded for any voting machine or machines or that an error, although not apparent on the face of the returns, exists, the superintendent shall, either of his or her own motion or upon the sworn petition of three electors of any precinct, order a recanvass of the votes shown on that particular machine or machines. Such recanvass may be conducted at any time prior to the certification of the consolidated returns by the superintendent. In conducting such recanvass, the superintendent shall summon the poll officers of the precinct; and such officers, in the presence of the superintendent, shall make a record of the number of the seal upon the voting machine or machines and the number of the protective counter or other device; shall make visible the registering counters of each such machine; and, without unlocking the machine against voting, shall recanvass the vote thereon. Before making such recanvass, the superintendent shall give notice in writing to the custodian of voting machines, to each candidate, and to the county or municipal chairperson of each party or body affected by the recanvass. Each such candidate may be present in person or by representative, and each of such parties or bodies may send two representatives to be present at such recanvass. If, upon such recanvass, it shall be found that the original canvass of the returns has been correctly made from the machine and that the discrepancy still remains unaccounted for, the superintendent, with the assistance of the custodian, in the presence of the poll officers and the authorized candidates and representatives, shall unlock the voting and counting mechanism of the machine and shall proceed thoroughly to examine and test the machine to determine and reveal the true cause or causes, if any, of the discrepancy in returns from such machine. Each counter shall be reset at zero before it is tested, after which it shall be operated at least 100 times. After the completion of such examination and test, the custodian shall then and there prepare a statement, in writing, giving in detail the result of the examination and test; and such statement shall be witnessed by the persons present and shall be filed with the superintendent. If, upon such recanvass, it shall appear that the original canvass of the returns by the poll officers was incorrect, such returns and all papers being prepared by the superintendent shall be corrected accordingly; provided, however, that in the case of returns from any precinct wherein the primary or election was held by the use of a voting machine equipped with a mechanism for printing paper proof sheets, such proof sheets, if mutually consistent, shall be deemed to be prima-facie evidence of the result of the primary or election and to be prima facie accurate; and there shall not be considered to be any discrepancy or error in the returns from any such precinct, such as to require a recanvass of the vote, if all available proof sheets, from the voting machine used therein, identified to the satisfaction of the superintendent and shown to his or her satisfaction to have been produced from proper custody, shall be mutually consistent; and, if the general and duplicate returns, or either of such returns from such precincts shall not correspond with such proof sheets, they and all other papers being prepared by the superintendent shall be corrected so as to correspond with such proof sheets in the absence of allegation of specific fraud or error proved to the satisfaction of the superintendent by the weight of the evidence; and only in such case shall the vote of such precinct be recanvassed under this Code section.

Whenever the difference between the number of votes received by a candidate who has been declared nominated for an office in a primary election or who has been declared elected to an office in an election or who has been declared eligible for a run-off primary or election and the number of votes received by any other candidate or candidates not declared so nominated or elected or eligible for a runoff shall be not more than one-half of 1 percent of the total votes which were cast for such office therein, any such candidate or candidates receiving a sufficient number of votes so that the difference between his or her vote and that of a candidate declared nominated, elected, or eligible for a runoff is not more than one-half of 1 percent of the total votes cast, within a period of two business days following the certification of the election results, shall have the right to a recount of the votes cast, if such request is made in writing by the losing candidate. If the office sought is a federal or state office voted upon by the electors of more than one county, the request shall be made to the Secretary of State who shall direct that the recount be performed in all counties in which electors voted for such office and notify the superintendents of the several counties involved of the request. In all other cases, the request shall be made to the superintendent. The superintendent or superintendents shall order a recount of such votes to be made immediately. If, upon such recount, it is determined that the original count was incorrect, the returns and all papers prepared by the superintendent, the superintendents, or the Secretary of State shall be corrected accordingly and the results recertified.

Whenever the difference between the number of votes for approval or rejection of a constitutional amendment or binding referendum question shall be not more than one-half of 1 percent of the total votes which were cast on such amendment or question therein, within a period of two business days following the certification of the election results, the Constitutional Amendments Publication Board shall be authorized in its discretion to call for a recount of the votes cast with regard to such amendment or question. In the case of a constitutional amendment or state-wide referendum question or a question voted upon by the electors of more than one county, the board shall direct the Secretary of State to cause a recount to be performed with regard to such amendment or question in all counties involved and notify the superintendents of the recount. In the case of questions voted upon by the electors of only one county or municipality, the board shall direct the Secretary of State to cause a recount to be conducted by the county or municipality involved and the Secretary of State shall notify the superintendent involved of the recount. Upon notification, the superintendent or superintendents shall order a recount of such votes to be made immediately. If, upon such recount, it is determined that the original count was incorrect, the returns and all papers prepared by the superintendent, the superintendents, or the Secretary of State shall be corrected accordingly and the results recertified.

Any other provision of this Code section to the contrary notwithstanding, a candidate for a federal or state office voted upon by the electors of more than one county may petition the Secretary of State for a recount or recanvass of votes, as appropriate, when it appears that a discrepancy or error, although not apparent on the face of the returns, has been made. The recount or recanvass may be ordered in the discretion of the Secretary of State in any and all counties in which electors voted for such office, and said recount or recanvass may be held at any time prior to the certification of the consolidated returns by the Secretary of State. A recount or recanvass shall be conducted by the appropriate superintendent or superintendents in the manner and pursuant to the procedures otherwise provided in this Code section for a recount or recanvass, as appropriate. The petition pursuant to this Code section shall be in writing and signed by the person or persons requesting the recount or recanvass. A petition shall set forth the discrepancies or errors and any evidence in support of the petitioner’s request for a recount or recanvass and shall be verified. The Secretary of State may require the petitioner or other persons to furnish additional information concerning the apparent discrepancies or errors in the counting or canvassing of votes.

The State Election Board shall be authorized to promulgate rules, regulations, and procedures to implement and administer the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 432, §§ 1-4, 8; Ga. L. 1962, p. 678, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1505, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 806, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 248, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 382, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 11; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 24; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 56; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 19/SB 82; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 41/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, inserted “or scanning ballots” near the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (a); inserted “one-half of” twice in the first sentence of paragraph (c)(1) and in the first sentence of paragraph (c)(2); and added subsection (e).

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-496.
Preparation and filing by superintendent of four copies of consolidated return of primary; electronic filing; superintendent to furnish final copy of each ballot used for primary.

Each county and municipal superintendent shall prepare four copies of the consolidated return of the primary to be certified by the superintendent on forms furnished by the Secretary of State, such consolidated returns to be filed immediately upon certification as follows:

One copy to be posted at the office of the election superintendent for the information of the public;

One copy to be filed in the superintendent’s office;

One copy to be forwarded to the Secretary of State together with a copy of each precinct return, the numbered list of voters of each precinct, and the returns and the numbered list of voters for absentee electors; and

One copy to be sealed and filed with the clerk of the superior court, in the case of a county election, or with the city clerk, in the case of a municipal election, as required by Code Section 21-2-500.

The Secretary of State is authorized to provide a method by which the election superintendent can file the results of primaries and elections electronically. Once the Secretary of State provides such a method of filing, the election superintendent shall file a copy of the election returns electronically in the manner prescribed by the Secretary of State in addition to the filing provided in subsection (a) of this Code section. The Secretary of State is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as necessary to provide for such an electronic filing.

Each county and municipal superintendent shall, upon certification, furnish to the Secretary of State in a manner determined by the Secretary of State a final copy of each ballot used for such primary.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 210, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 114; Civil Code 1910, § 128; Code 1933, § 34-3202; Code 1933, § 34-1507, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 30; Ga. L. 1979, p. 631, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 19; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 817, § 5/HB 1098; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, §§ 36, 37/SB 92.

21-2-497.
Preparation and filing by superintendent of four copies of consolidated return of elections; superintendent to furnish final copy of each ballot used for election.

Each county and municipal superintendent shall prepare four copies of the consolidated return of the election to be certified by the superintendent on forms furnished by the Secretary of State, such consolidated returns to be filed immediately upon certification as follows:

One copy to be posted at the office of the election superintendent for the information of the public;

One copy to be filed and recorded as a permanent record in the minutes of the superintendent’s office;

One copy to be sealed and filed with the clerk of the superior court, in the case of a county election, or with the city clerk, in the case of a municipal election, as required by Code Section 21-2-500; and

One copy to be returned immediately to the Secretary of State unless required as follows:

In the case of election of federal and state officers, a separate return showing totals of the votes cast for each of such officers respectively shall be forwarded by the superintendent to the Secretary of State on forms furnished by the Secretary of State;

In the case of referendum elections provided for by an Act of the General Assembly, the returns shall immediately be certified by the authority holding such election to the Secretary of State, along with the precinct returns and numbered list of voters for each precinct. In addition thereto, the official citation of the Act involved and the purpose of such election shall be sent to the Secretary of State at the same time. The Secretary of State shall maintain a permanent record of such certifications;

In the case of elections on constitutional amendments, the returns shall be certified immediately to the Secretary of State. Upon receiving the certified returns from the various superintendents, the Secretary of State shall immediately proceed to canvass and tabulate the votes cast on such amendments and certify the results to the Governor; and

In the case of election for presidential electors, a separate return shall be prepared by each superintendent and certified immediately to the Secretary of State.

Each county and municipal superintendent shall, upon certification, furnish to the Secretary of State in a manner determined by the Secretary of State a final copy of each ballot used for such election.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 210, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 114; Civil Code 1910, § 128; Ga. L. 1918, p. 154, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1921, p. 232, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 34-2201, 34-2202, 34-3202; Code 1933, § 34-1508, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 30; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 6-6; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 6; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 12; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 817, § 6/HB 1098; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 38/SB 92.

History of Code section.

The language of this Code section is derived in part from the decision in McGregor v. Clark,

155 Ga. 384

,

116 S.E. 823

(1923).

21-2-498.
Precertification tabulation audits.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Incorrect outcome” is when the winner of a contest or the answer to a proposed constitutional amendment or question would be different from the results found in a manual recount of paper official ballots.

“Risk limit” means the largest statistical probability that an incorrect outcome is not detected or corrected in a risk-limiting audit.

“Risk-limiting audit” means an audit protocol that makes use of statistical methods and is designed to limit to acceptable levels the risk of certifying a preliminary election outcome that constitutes an incorrect outcome.

As soon as possible, but no later than the November, 2020, general election, the local election superintendents shall conduct precertification tabulation audits for any federal or state general election in accordance with requirements set forth by rule or regulation of the State Election Board. Audits performed under this Code section shall be conducted by manual inspection of random samples of the paper official ballots.

In conducting each audit, the local election superintendents shall:

Complete the audit prior to final certification of the contest;

Ensure that all types of ballots are included in the audit, whether cast in person, by absentee ballot, advance voting, provisional ballot, or otherwise;

Provide a report of the unofficial final tabulated vote results for the contest to the public prior to conducting the audit;

Complete the audit in public view; and

Provide details of the audit to the public within 48 hours of completion.

The State Election Board shall be authorized to promulgate rules, regulations, and procedures to implement and administer the provisions of this Code section. The procedures prescribed by the State Election Board shall include security procedures to ensure that collection of validly cast ballots is complete, accurate, and trustworthy throughout the audit.

The Secretary of State shall conduct a risk-limiting audit pilot program with a risk limit of not greater than 10 percent in one or more counties by December 31, 2021. The Secretary of State shall review the results of the pilot program and, within 90 days following the election in which such pilot program is used, shall provide the members of the General Assembly with a comprehensive report, including a plan on how to implement risk-limiting audits state wide. If such risk-limiting audit is successful in achieving the specified confidence level within five business days following the election for which it was conducted, then all audits performed pursuant to this Code section shall be similarly conducted, beginning not later than November 1, 2024.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-498

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 42/HB 316.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 2, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to the Constitutional Officers Election Board.
The former Code section was based on Code 1933, § 34-1509, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 30, Ga. L. 1987, p. 997, § 2, Ga. L. 1994, p. 279, § 10 and was repealed by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 13, effective July 1, 1995.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 enactment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-499.
Duty of Secretary of State as to tabulation, computation, and canvassing of votes for state and federal officers; certification of presidential electors by Governor.

Upon receiving the certified returns of any election from the various superintendents, the Secretary of State shall immediately proceed to tabulate, compute, and canvass the votes cast for all candidates described in subparagraph (a)(4)(A) of Code Section 21-2-497 and upon all questions voted for by the electors of more than one county and shall thereupon certify and file in his or her office the tabulation thereof. In the event an error is found in the certified returns presented to the Secretary of State or in the tabulation, computation, or canvassing of votes as described in this Code section, the Secretary of State shall notify the county submitting the incorrect returns and direct the county to correct and recertify such returns. Upon receipt by the Secretary of State of the corrected certified returns of the county, the Secretary of State shall issue a new certification of the results and shall file the same in his or her office.

The Secretary of State shall also, upon receiving the certified returns for presidential electors, proceed to tabulate, compute, and canvass the votes cast for each slate of presidential electors and shall immediately lay them before the Governor. Not later than 5:00 P.M. on the seventeenth day following the date on which such election was conducted, the Secretary of State shall certify the votes cast for all candidates described in subparagraph (a)(4)(A) of Code Section 21-2-497 and upon all questions voted for by the electors of more than one county and shall no later than that same time lay the returns for presidential electors before the Governor. The Governor shall enumerate and ascertain the number of votes for each person so voted and shall certify the slates of presidential electors receiving the highest number of votes. The Governor shall certify the slates of presidential electors no later than 5:00 P.M. on the eighteenth day following the date on which such election was conducted. Notwithstanding the deadlines specified in this Code section, such times may be altered for just cause by an order of a judge of superior court of this state.

The Secretary of State shall not count, tabulate, or publish the names of any write-in candidates for whom the notice of intention of candidacy has not been provided in compliance with Code Section 21-2-133.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1510, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 30; Ga. L. 1987, p. 997, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 14; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 26; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 57; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 39/SB 92; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 43/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, in subsection (b), substituted “seventeenth” for “fourteenth” near the beginning of the second sentence, and substituted “eighteenth” for “fifteenth” in the middle of the fourth sentence.

Cross references.

Duty of Secretary of State to destroy quadrennially all filed election returns of officials whose terms of office have expired, § 45-13-20(7).

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-500.
Delivery of voting materials; presentation to grand jury in certain cases; preservation and destruction; destruction of unused ballots.

Immediately upon completing the returns required by this article, in the case of elections other than municipal elections, the superintendent shall deliver in sealed containers to the clerk of the superior court or, if designated by the clerk of the superior court, to the county records manager or other office or officer under the jurisdiction of a county governing authority which maintains or is responsible for records, as provided in Code Section 50-18-99, the used and void ballots and the stubs of all ballots used; one copy of the oaths of poll officers; and one copy of each numbered list of voters, tally paper, voting machine paper proof sheet, and return sheet involved in the primary or election. In addition, the superintendent shall deliver copies of the voting machine ballot labels, computer chips containing ballot tabulation programs, copies of computer records of ballot design, and similar items or an electronic record of the program by which votes are to be recorded or tabulated, which is captured prior to the election, and which is stored on some alternative medium such as a CD-ROM or floppy disk simultaneously with the programming of the PROM or other memory storage device. The clerk, county records manager, or the office or officer designated by the clerk shall hold such ballots and other documents under seal, unless otherwise directed by the superior court, for at least 24 months, after which time they shall be presented to the grand jury for inspection at its next meeting. Such ballots and other documents shall be preserved in the office of the clerk, county records manager, or officer designated by the clerk until the adjournment of such grand jury, and then they may be destroyed, unless otherwise provided by order of the superior court.

The superintendent shall retain all unused ballots for 30 days after the election or primary and, if no challenge or contest is filed prior to or during that period that could require future use of such ballots, may thereafter destroy such unused ballots. If a challenge or contest is filed during that period that could require the use of such ballots, they shall be retained until the final disposition of the challenge or contest and, if remaining unused, may thereafter be destroyed.

Immediately upon completing the returns required by this article, the municipal superintendent shall deliver in sealed containers to the city clerk the used and void ballots and the stubs of all ballots used; one copy of the oaths of poll officers; and one copy of each numbered list of voters, tally paper, voting machine paper proof sheet, and return sheet involved in the primary or election. In addition, the municipal superintendent shall deliver copies of the voting machine ballot labels, computer chips containing ballot tabulation programs, copies of computer records of ballot design, and similar items or an electronic record of the program by which votes are to be recorded or tabulated, which is captured prior to the election, and which is stored on some alternative medium such as a CD-ROM or floppy disk simultaneously with the programming of the PROM or other memory storage device. Such ballots and other documents shall be preserved under seal in the office of the city clerk for at least 24 months; and then they may be destroyed unless otherwise provided by order of the mayor and council if a contest has been filed or by court order, provided that the electors list, voter’s certificates, and duplicate oaths of assisted electors shall be immediately returned by the superintendent to the county registrar.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1515, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 30; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 33; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1074, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 26; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 38; Ga. L. 1998, p. 145, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 6; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 58; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 21/HB 268.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “county registrar” for “county or municipal registrar as appropriate” at the end of the last sentence of subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).